District of Columbia statutes.
31-4727

Applicability of §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, §§ 31-4725 through 31-4730 shall apply to all policies used in the District of Columbia.

(b)

Sections 31-4725 through 31-4730 shall not apply to the following:

(1)

A policy which is a security under federal legislative jurisdiction.

(2)

(A)

Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a group policy covering 1,000 or more lines when issued, other than a group credit life insurance policy or a group credit health insurance policy.

(B)

No certificate issued pursuant to a group policy used in the District of Columbia may be exempt.

(3)

A group annuity contract which finances pension, profit-sharing, or deferred compensation plans.

(4)

A form used in connection with a contractual provision for a policy on a form permitted to be issued before the approval dates in § 31-4730 for similar forms.

(5)

The renewal of a policy used before the approval dates in § 31-4730 for similar forms.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 27
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 25(j), 33 DCR 7836

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-4725 and § 31-4730.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-533.